New York, session 2025-2026, S2094.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 13 of section 220.16 of the penal law, as 2 amended by chapter 75 of the laws of 1995, is amended and a new subdivi- 3 sion 14 is added to read as follows: 4 13. phencyclidine and said phencyclidine weighs one thousand two 5 hundred fifty milligrams or more[.]; or 6 14. one or more preparations, compounds, mixtures or substances 7 containing heroin and said preparations, compounds, mixtures or 8 substances are of an aggregate weight of 1.5 grams or more, or such 9 preparations, compounds, mixtures or substances are packaged in fifty or 10 more containers, packets or "decks". 11 § 2. Subdivision 7 of section 220.18 of the penal law, as amended by 12 chapter 75 of the laws of 1995, is amended and a new subdivision 8 is 13 added to read as follows: 14 7. methadone and said methadone weighs two thousand eight hundred 15 eighty milligrams or more[.]; or 16 8. one or more preparations, compounds, mixtures or substances 17 containing heroin and said preparations, compounds, mixtures or 18 substances are of an aggregate weight of twelve grams or more, or such 19 preparations, compounds, mixtures or substances are packaged in four 20 hundred or more containers, packets or "decks". 21 § 3. Subdivision 2 of section 220.21 of the penal law, as amended by 22 chapter 75 of the laws of 1995, is amended and a new subdivision 3 is 23 added to read as follows: 24 2. methadone and said methadone weighs five thousand seven hundred 25 sixty milligrams or more[.]; or EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03098-01-5 S. 2094 2 1 3. one or more preparations, compounds, mixtures or substances 2 containing heroin and said preparations, compounds, mixtures or 3 substances are of an aggregate weight of twenty-four grams or more, or 4 such preparations, compounds, mixtures or substances are packaged in 5 eight hundred or more containers, packets or "decks". 6 § 4. Subdivision 7 of section 220.41 of the penal law, as amended by 7 chapter 75 of the laws of 1995, is amended and a new subdivision 8 is 8 added to read as follows: 9 7. methadone and the methadone weighs three hundred sixty milligrams 10 or more[.]; or 11 8. one or more preparations, compounds, mixtures or substances 12 containing heroin and the preparations, compounds, mixtures or 13 substances are of an aggregate weight of 1.5 grams or more, or such 14 preparations, compounds, mixtures or substances are packaged in fifty or 15 more containers, packets or "decks". 16 § 5. Subdivision 2 of section 220.43 of the penal law, as amended by 17 chapter 75 of the laws of 1995, is amended and a new subdivision 3 is 18 added to read as follows: 19 2. methadone and the methadone weighs two thousand eight hundred 20 eighty milligrams or more[.]; or 21 3. one or more preparations, compounds, mixtures or substances 22 containing heroin and the preparations, compounds, mixtures or 23 substances are of an aggregate weight of six grams or more, or such 24 preparations, mixtures or substances are packaged in two hundred or more 25 containers, packets or "decks". 26 § 6. This act shall take effect on the first of November next succeed- 27 ing the date upon which it shall have become a law.